Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.200

Director—Broad administrative discretion.

The director has the power, and broad administrative discretion, to administer and interpret the provisions of this chapter to ensure the protection of the public.

[ 1994 c 92 s 291; 1991 c 355 s 20.]